04_Morphology/morphEng/grn.twol
Alphabet
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
%{m%}:e
%{m%}:0
%{n%}:n
%{n%}:m
;

Sets

vw = A E I O U
     a e i o u ;

cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z
      B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z ;

Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"suffixes contain e only after consonants"
%{m%}:0 <=> e: %>: _ ;	

"double nasal"
%{n%}:n <=> n: %>: _ ;

"delete vowels"
[o:0|e:0|a:0|i:0|u:0] <=> _ %>: i: s: t: ; 
